Hawaii statutes.
§339D-9 Administrative penalties; fees. (a)
In addition to any other administrative or judicial remedy provided by this
chapter or by rules adopted under this chapter for a violation thereof, the
department is authorized to impose by order administrative penalties and is
further authorized to set, charge, and collect
administrative fines and to recover administrative fees and costs, including
attorney's fees and costs, or to bring legal action to recover administrative
fines and fees and costs, including attorney's fees and costs.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the
department shall not have the authority to assess any fees, including an
advanced recycling fee, registration fee, or other fee, on consumers,
television manufacturers, or retailers for recovery of covered televisions
except those noted in sections 339D-4 and 339D-22. [L
Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 183, §13; am L 2011, c 43, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next